Utah statutes.
77-38a-501.   Default and sanctions.

(1)  When a defendant defaults in the payment of a judgment for restitution or any installment ordered, the court, on motion of the prosecutor, parole or probation agent, victim, or on its own motion may impose sanctions against the defendant as provided in Section 76-3-201.1.

(2)  The court may not impose a sanction against the defendant under Subsection (1) if:

(a)  the defendant's sole default in the payment of a judgement for restitution is the failure to pay restitution ordered under Subsection 76-3-201(6) regarding costs of incarceration in a county correctional facility; and

(b)  the sanction would extend the defendant's term of probation or parole.

